Utah statutes.
13-48-102.   Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

(1)  "Motor vehicle license cost recovery fee" means a fee or charge that may be separately stated and charged on the short-term motor vehicle lease or rental contract in a motor vehicle lease or rental transaction originating in this state to recover the costs incurred by a motor vehicle rental company to license, title, register, obtain license plates for, and inspect rental motor vehicles.

(2)  "Motor vehicle rental company" means any person or organization in the business of renting motor vehicles to the public.

